Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.080

Immunity.

The director, members of the board, and individuals acting on behalf of the director or the board are immune to liability in any civil action or criminal case based on any acts performed in the course of their duties under this chapter, except for acts displaying intentional or willful misconduct.

[ 2011 c 256 s 5; 1999 c 263 s 9.]